Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5883YH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2137 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 481A.161 Definition. 1 As used in this subchapter, âcarcass removerâ means any 2 person, firm, partnership, or corporation engaged in the 3 business of removing and disposing of the carcass of any wild 4 animal from public or private land, including any public road 5 or right-of-way. 6 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 481A.162 License ââ reciprocity. 7 1. The commission shall issue licenses and area permits 8 to carcass removers that allow the carcass remover to remove 9 and dispose of the carcass of any wild animal from public or 10 private land, including any public road or right-of-way, in 11 Iowa. A license shall be required of each carcass remover 12 and each employee, agent, or representative of a carcass 13 remover. A carcass remover shall conduct business only within 14 a geographic area specified on the carcass removerâs license 15 or at the place of business specified on the license of any 16 carcass remover. A nonresident licensed carcass remover may 17 purchase area permits to operate within geographic areas 18 other than within the area specified on the carcass removerâs 19 license. A resident licensed carcass remover may obtain 20 area permits without fee. Each area permit shall be valid 21 only within the geographic area specified on the area permit 22 and shall entitle the carcass remover and employee, agent, 23 or representative of the licensed carcass remover to operate 24 within that geographic area. The commission shall, upon 25 application and the payment of the required license or permit 26 fee, if any, furnish the proper license and area permits to the 27 remover. 28 2. a. A resident of another state shall pay a fee in an 29 amount established by rules adopted pursuant to paragraph âbâ 30 for the nonresident carcass removerâs license unless that state 31 has a reciprocity agreement with this state. The reciprocity 32 agreement must provide that each state will charge nonresidents 33 from the other state the same fee for the nonresident carcass 34 removerâs license and the fee under the agreement must be less 35 -1- LSB 5883YH (3) 91 sb/js 1/ 4 H.F. 2137 than the fee of this state for nonresidents and higher than the 1 fee of this state for residents. 2 b. The commission shall adopt by rule fees for the issuance 3 of resident and nonresident carcass remover licenses and area 4 permits under this subchapter. The fees shall be based on the 5 cost of administering this subchapter. 6 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 481A.163 Possession of carcasses. 7 A licensed carcass remover may have in their possession at 8 any time carcasses of animals that have been lawfully removed. 9 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 481A.164 Disposal requirements ââ 10 antlers. 11 The antlers on a deer removed by a licensed carcass remover 12 shall be delivered to the local conservation officer for 13 disposal. 14 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 481A.165 Reports. 15 Carcass removers shall keep accurate, current records 16 of carcass removal and disposal. The records shall show 17 the number and kinds of carcasses that have been removed 18 and disposed of, the date of removal and disposal, and the 19 approximate location of the disposal. Such records shall be 20 open at all reasonable times to inspection by the commission. 21 On or before May 15 of each year, each carcass remover shall 22 file a verified report with the commission. The report shall 23 include all removals and disposals for the preceding year. 24 Sec. 6. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. The Code editor shall 25 designate sections 481A.161 through 481A.164, as enacted by 26 this Act, as a new subchapter within chapter 481A, entitled 27 âCarcass Removersâ. 28